Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-620
Council; departments and offices; control.

The council shall have authority, subject to the provisions of sections 19-601 to 19-648, to create and discontinue departments, offices and employments, and by ordinance or resolution to prescribe, limit or change the compensation of such officers and employees; Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be so construed as to interfere with or to affect the office or powers of city school or school district officers, or of any officer named in the state Constitution.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 21, p. 503;

C.S.1922, § 4558;

C.S.1929, § 19-621;

R.S.1943, § 19-620.